Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-923
Cease and desist order; procedure; appeal.

If the director believes that any person has engaged in or is about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of the Delayed Deposit Services Licensing Act or any rule, regulation, or order of the director, the director may issue a cease and desist order and prohibit the making of additional delayed deposit transactions as part of such order.

Upon entry of a cease and desist order the director shall promptly notify in writing all persons to whom the order is directed that it has been entered and of the reasons for the order. Any person to whom the order is directed may in writing request a hearing within fifteen business days after the date of the issuance of the order. Upon receipt of such written request, the matter shall be set for hearing within thirty business days after receipt by the director, unless the parties consent to a later date or the hearing officer sets a later date for good cause. If a hearing is not requested within fifteen business days and none is ordered by the director, the order of the director shall automatically become final and shall remain in effect until modified or vacated by the director. If a hearing is requested or ordered, the director, after notice and hearing, shall issue his or her written findings of fact and conclusions of law and may affirm, vacate, or modify the order.

The director may vacate or modify an order if he or she finds that the conditions which caused its entry have changed or that it is otherwise in the public interest to do so. Any person aggrieved by a final order of the director may appeal the order, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1994, LB 967, § 23;

Laws 2001, LB 53, § 107;

Laws 2018, LB194, § 18.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.